South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3751.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (12) South Carolina gross income does not include any income included in federal gross income that is derived from the receipt, sale, exchange, or otherwise disposal of digital assets such as cryptocurrency. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to tax years beginning after 2024. ----XX----